nb: Egenskap for klistremerkets synlighet: Fluorescerende; Selvlysende; Ugjennomsiktig; Perforert vindusgrafikk (enveis sikt); Reflekterende; Gjennomsiktig/klar; Annet
es: Propiedad de visibilidad de la calcomanía: Fluorescente; Brilla en la oscuridad; Opaco; Gráfico de ventana perforado (visión unidireccional); Reflectante; Transparente/claro; Otro
ru: Свойство видимости декали: Флуоресцентная; Светящаяся в темноте; Непрозрачная; Перфорированная (с односторонней видимостью); Светоотражающая; Прозрачная; Другое
bg-BG: Свойство за видимост на стикера: Флуоресцентно; Светещо в тъмното; Непрозрачно; Перфорирана графика за стъкло (еднопосочна видимост); Отразяващо; Прозрачно; Друго
sv: Egenskap för dekalens synlighet: Fluorescerande; Självlysande i mörker; Ogenomskinlig; Perforerad fönsterdekor (envägssyn); Reflekterande; Genomskinlig/klar; Övrigt
pt-PT: Propriedade de visibilidade do decalque: Fluorescente; Brilha no escuro; Opaco; Gráfico perfurado para janelas (visão unidirecional); Refletor; Transparente/claro; Outro
fi: Teippauksen näkyvyysominaisuus: Fluoresoiva; Pimeässä hohtava; Läpinäkymätön; Rei'itetty ikkunateippi (yksisuuntainen näkyvyys); Heijastava; Läpinäkyvä/kirkas; Muu
en: Decal visibility property: Fluorescent; Glow in the dark; Opaque; Perforated window graphic (one-way vision); Reflective; Transparent/clear; Other
el: Ιδιότητα προβολής αυτοκόλλητου: Φθορίζον; Φωσφορίζον; Αδιαφανές; Διάτρητο γραφικό τζαμιού (μονής όψης); Ανακλαστικό; Διαφανές/καθαρό; Άλλο
hr-HR: Svojstvo vidljivosti naljepnice: Fluorescentno; Svijetli u mraku; Neprozirno; Perforirana prozorska grafika (jednosmjerna vidljivost); Reflektirajuće; Prozirno; Ostalo
tr: Çıkartmanın görünürlük özelliği: Floresan; Karanlıkta parlayan; Opak; Delikli cam grafiği (tek yönlü görüş); Reflektif; Transparan/şeffaf; Diğer
da: Mærkatsynlighedens egenskab: Fluorescerende; Selvevlysende; Uigennemsigtig; Perforeret vinduesgrafik (envejsudsigt); Reflekterende; Gennemsigtig/klar; Andet
cs: Vlastnost viditelnosti samolepky/dekálu: Fluorescenční; Svítící ve tmě; Neprůhledný; Dírkovaná grafika na okna (jednosměrně průhledná); Reflexní; Průhledný/čirý; Jiné
pt-BR: Propriedade de visibilidade do decalque: Fluorescente; Brilha no escuro; Opaco; Película perfurada para janela (visão unidirecional); Refletivo; Transparente; Outra
sk-SK: Vlastnosť viditeľnosti nálepky: Fluorescenčné; Svietiace v tme; Nepriehľadné; Perforovaná okenná grafika (jednosmerná priehľadnosť); Reflexné; Priehľadné/číre; Iné
nl: Decal zichtbaarheid eigenschap: Fluorescerend; Glow-in-the-dark; Ondoorzichtig; Geperforeerde raamfolie (one-way vision); Reflecterend; Transparant; Overige
ro-RO: Proprietatea de vizibilitate a autocolantului: Fluorescent; Fosforescent; Opac; Grafică perforată pentru geam (vizibilitate unidirecțională); Reflectorizant; Transparent/clar; Altele
vi: Đặc tính hiển thị của decal: Huỳnh quang; Dạ quang; Đục; Đề can dán kính đục lỗ (nhìn một chiều); Phản quang; Trong suốt; Khác
ko: 데칼 가시성 속성: 형광; 야광; 불투명; 천공 윈도우 그래픽(원웨이 비전); 반사; 투명/투명색; 기타
de: Sichtbarkeitseigenschaft des Aufklebers: Fluoreszierend; Im Dunkeln leuchtend; Blickdicht; Lochfolie (One-Way-Vision); Reflektierend; Transparent/Klar; Sonstige
zh-CN: 车贴可见性特征: 荧光; 夜光; 不透明; 穿孔车窗贴（单向透视）; 反光; 透明; 其他
ja: デカールの可視性プロパティ: 蛍光; 蓄光; 不透明; 穴あきウィンドウグラフィック (ワンウェイビジョン); 反射; 透明/クリア; その他
hu: A matrica láthatósági tulajdonsága: Fluoreszkáló; Sötétben világító; Átlátszatlan; Perforált ablakgrafika (egyirányú átlátás); Fényvisszaverő; Átlátszó/víztiszta; Egyéb
lt-LT: Lipduko matomumo savybė: Fluorescencinis; Švytintis tamsoje; Nepermatomas; Perforuota langų grafika (vienpusio matomumo); Atspindintis; Skaidrus; Kita
it: proprietà di visibilità decalcomania: Fluorescente; Fosforescente; Opaco; Grafica per vetri forata (visione unidirezionale); Riflettente; Trasparente; Altra
th: คุณสมบัติการมองเห็นของสติ๊กเกอร์: สะท้อนแสงไฟ; เรืองแสงในที่มืด; ทึบแสง; กราฟิกติดหน้าต่างแบบเจาะรู (มองทะลุได้ด้านเดียว); สะท้อนแสง; ใส/โปร่งใส; อื่นๆ
pl: Właściwość widoczności naklejki: Fluorescencyjne; Świecące w ciemności; Nieprzezroczyste; Grafika perforowana (One Way Vision); Odblaskowe; Przezroczyste/klarowne; Inne
fr: Propriété de visibilité de l’autocollant: Fluorescent; Phosphorescent; Opaque; Adhésif micro-perforé (vision à sens unique); Réfléchissant; Transparent/clair; Autre
sl-SI: Lastnost vidnosti nalepke: Fluorescentno; Sveti v temi; Neprosojno; Perforirana grafika za steklo (enosmerna vidljivost); Odsevno; Prosojno/prozorno; Drugo
zh-TW: 貼紙可見性屬性: 螢光; 夜光; 不透明; 洞洞貼 (單向透視); 反光; 透明; 其他